California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) Special flood protection projects under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12310) of Part 4.8 of Division 6 of the Water Code, as that chapter may be amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, and approved in Prop. 1E on Nov. 7, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.824.

(a) Five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation to the department, for payment for the state’s share of the nonfederal costs, and related costs, of flood control and flood prevention projects authorized under any of the following:

(1) The State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code).

(2) The Flood Control Law of 1946 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code).

(3) The California Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12850) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code).

(b) The costs described in subdivision (a) include costs incurred in connection with either of the following:

(1) The granting of credits or loans to local agencies, as applicable, pursuant to Sections 12585.3, 12585.4 of, subdivision (d) of Section 12585.5 of, and Sections 12866.3 and 12866.4 of, the Water Code.

(2) The implementation of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 12840) of Part 6 of Division 6 of the Water Code.

(c) The funds made available by this section shall be allocated only to projects that are not part of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.825.

Two hundred ninety million dollars ($290,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation, for the protection, creation, and enhancement of flood protection corridors and bypasses through any of the following actions:

(a) Acquiring easements and other interests in real property to protect or enhance flood protection corridors and bypasses while preserving or enhancing the agricultural use of the real property.

(b) Constructing new levees necessary for the establishment of a flood protection corridor or bypass.

(c) Setting back existing flood control levees, and in conjunction with undertaking those setbacks, strengthening or modifying existing levees and weirs.

(d) Relocating or flood proofing structures necessary for the establishment of a flood protection corridor.

(e) Acquiring interests in, or providing incentives for maintaining agricultural uses of, real property that is located in a flood plain that cannot reasonably be made safe from future flooding.

(f) Acquiring easements and other interests in real property to protect or enhance flood protection corridors while preserving or enhancing the wildlife value of the real property.

(g) Flood plain mapping and related activities, including both of the following:

(1) The development of flood hazard maps, including all necessary studies and surveys.

(2) Alluvial fan flood plain mapping.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.827.

Three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation to the department, for grants for stormwater flood management projects that meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Have a nonstate cost share of not less than 50 percent.

(b) Are not part of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(c) Are designed to manage stormwater runoff to reduce flood damage and where feasible, provide other benefits, including groundwater recharge, water quality improvement, and ecosystem restoration.

(d) Comply with applicable regional water quality control plans.

(e) Are consistent with any applicable integrated regional water management plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.827.2.

(a) The department shall develop project selection and evaluation guidelines to implement Section 5096.827. The State Water Resources Control Board shall advise the department on the water quality portions of the guidelines, relying as appropriate on the stormwater guidelines developed by the State Water Resources Control Board pursuant to Section 75050.2.

(b) The guidelines shall include a provision that gives preference to a project that reduces flood damages for which one or both of the following applies:

(1) The project is not receiving state funding for flood control or flood prevention projects pursuant to Section 5096.824 or Section 75034.

(2) The project provides multiple benefits, including, but not limited to, water quality improvements, ecosystem benefits, reduction of instream erosion and sedimentation, and groundwater recharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 610, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.827.3.

Consistent with the requirements of Sections 5096.827 and 5096.827.2, the design and construction of projects for combined municipal sewer and stormwater systems are eligible for financing under Section 5096.827.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 610, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.828.

Funds provided by this article are only available for appropriation until July 1, 2016, and at that time the amount of indebtedness authorized by this chapter shall be reduced by the amount of funds provided by this article that have not been appropriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.830.

The development or adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria for the purposes of this chapter is not subject to the review or approval of the Office of Administrative Law or to any other requirement of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 368, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Program Expenditures [5096.953. - 5096.9545.]

5096.953.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall provide for an independent audit of expenditures pursuant to this chapter to ensure that all moneys are expended in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. The secretary shall publish a list of all program and project expenditures pursuant to this chapter not less than annually, in written form, and shall post an electronic form of the list on the Resources Agency’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.954.

On or before January 1, 2008, the department shall adopt emergency regulations to implement Section 12585.7 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 178, Sec. 13.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.9545.

(a) For the purposes of any levee evaluation activities funded by the department, the department shall not require a local cost-share for the following levee evaluations:

(1) Evaluations of levees that are part of the facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(2) Evaluations of levees located in the Central Valley that are not part of the State Plan of Flood Control, and that protect an urban area, as defined by subdivision (k) of Section 5096.805.

(3) Evaluations of levees chosen to be performed by the department as part of an effort to protect
 critical water conveyance infrastructure through the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(b) The department shall identify the levees described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) in the Bond Expenditure Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Plan described in Section 5096.820 and notify the Governor and the Legislature of the location of these levees.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5096.955 (as added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 178, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 428.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Fiscal Provisions [5096.955. - 5096.968.]

5096.955.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of four billion ninety million dollars ($4,090,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 5096.966, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute valid and binding obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee pursuant to this section. The bonds shall be sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by the committee pursuant to Section 16731 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.956.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law, and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.957.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Finance Committee is hereby created. For the purposes of this chapter, the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Treasurer, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the department is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.958.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter to carry out this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.959.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.960.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum that is necessary to carry out Section 5096.963, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.961.

The department may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The department shall execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the department in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.962.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and for the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.963.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with interest at the rate earned by the money in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.964.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this chapter shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.965.

Pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the cost of bond issuance shall be paid out of the bond proceeds. These costs shall be shared proportionally by each program funded through this bond act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.966.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of the bonds under this chapter shall include approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.967.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 1E at the November 7, 2006, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.968.

Notwithstanding any other law, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of this chapter are reallocated to finance the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 26.7 (commencing with Section 79700) of the Water Code. The funds available for reallocation shall be made on a pro-rata basis from each bond allocation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.7. Archaeological, Paleontological, and Historical Sites [5097. - 5097.7.]

5097.

As used in this chapter, “state lands” means lands owned by, or under the jurisdiction of, the state or any state agency. It does not include lands owned by, or under the jurisdiction of a city, county, or district, or fire trails under the jurisdiction of the Division of Forestry in the Department of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.1.

Prior to the commencement of construction of any major public works project on any state lands, the state agency proposing to construct the project, or on whose behalf the project is to be constructed, may submit to the State Department of Parks and Recreation general plans sufficient to indicate the nature of the project, its location, and the excavations which will be undertaken in connection with the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.2.

Upon receipt of plans for a proposed construction project upon state lands, the department may conduct an archaeological site survey on the affected state lands in order to determine whether the lands may contain any historic or prehistoric ruins, burial grounds, archaeological or vertebrate paleontological sites, including fossilized footprints, inscriptions made by human agency, rock art, or any other archaeological, paleontological or historical feature. The department shall submit to the state agency, by or on whose behalf the project is to be constructed, its recommendations concerning the preservation, photographing, recording, or excavation for, any archaeological, paleontological, or historical features which may be located upon the lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 192, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.3.

The state agency, by or on whose behalf public works are to be constructed on state lands, may undertake such surveys, excavations, or other operations on the state lands as it determines to be necessary to preserve or record any archaeological, paleontological, or historical features, including rock art, which may be located on the lands, after receiving the recommendations of the department, or the state agency may contract with the department to undertake those operations. The department may carry out the operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 192, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.4.

No archaelogical program conducted by the Department of Parks and Recreation shall impair, impede or delay any state construction project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.5.

(a) A person shall not knowingly and willfully excavate upon, or remove, destroy, injure, or deface, any historic or prehistoric ruins, burial grounds, archaeological or vertebrate paleontological site, including fossilized footprints, inscriptions made by human agency, rock art, or any other archaeological, paleontological or historical feature, situated on public lands, except with the express permission of the public agency having jurisdiction over the lands.

(b) As used in this section, “public lands” means lands owned by, or under the jurisdiction of, the state, or any city, county, district, authority, or public corporation, or any agency thereof.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) (1) Upon conviction, the court shall order restitution, unless the court decides otherwise pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, to either of the following:

 (A) To the state agency, including any department of the state, a conservancy, or other instrumentality of the state, that has primary management authority over the public lands where the violation occurred, including public lands managed by the state under an agreement with another public entity.

(B) To the city, county, district, or
 other local agency owning or having jurisdiction over the public lands where the violation occurred.

(2) When determining restitution, the court shall consider evidence from the state or local agency to which restitution will be granted of the commercial and archaeological value of the property as follows:

(A) The commercial value of an archaeological resource involved in a violation shall be its fair market value. If the violation has resulted in damage to the archaeological resource, the state or local agency shall determine the fair market value using the condition of the archaeological resource prior to the violation to the extent that its prior condition can be ascertained. For purposes of this subparagraph, “fair market value” means the price that a seller is willing to accept and a buyer is willing to pay on the open market.

(B) The archaeological value of an archaeological resource involved in a violation shall be the value of the information associated with the archaeological resource. The state or local agency shall appraise the value in terms of the costs of the retrieval of the scientific information that would have been obtainable prior to the violation.

(C) The costs considered for restitution may include, but are not limited to, the cost of preparing a research design, conducting background research, conducting field work, carrying out laboratory analyses, and preparing reports that would be necessary to realize the information potential of the resource.

(D) The state or local agency shall follow the professional standards for determining commercial and archaeological value, in accordance with those procedures established in the
 federal Archaeological Resources Protection Act of 1979 (Public Law 96-95), as amended, and in compliance with the Uniform Regulations set forth in Subpart A (commencing with Section 7.1) of Part 7 of Title 43 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(E) For the purposes of restitution, the court shall consider the cost of restoration and repair of archaeological resources damaged as a result of a violation as well as the costs already incurred for emergency restoration or repair work, plus those costs projected by the state or local agency necessary to complete restoration and repair, that may include, but are not limited to, the costs of any one or more of the following:

(i) Reconstruction of the archaeological resource.

(ii) Stabilization of the archaeological resource.

(iii) Ground contour reconstruction and surface stabilization.

(iv) Research necessary to carry out reconstruction or stabilization.

(v) Physical barriers or other protective devices necessitated by the disturbance of the archaeological resource to protect it from further disturbance.

(vi) Examination and analysis of the archaeological resource, including recording remaining archaeological information where necessitated by disturbance in order to salvage remaining values that cannot be otherwise conserved.

(vii) Reinterment of human remains in accordance with religious customs and federal, state, local, or tribal law, where appropriate.

(e) If human remains that are determined to be Native American are recovered as a result of an action brought pursuant to this section, the requirements of Section 5097.9 shall apply to those remains.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the restitution funds received pursuant to subdivision (d) by a state agency, conservancy, or other instrumentality of the state, are hereby continuously appropriated for expenditure by that state agency, conservancy, or other instrumentality only for the costs of restoring and repairing the archaeological resources that are the subject of the violation.

(2) The restitution funds received pursuant to subdivision (d) by a city, county, district, or other local agency may be expended by that city, county, district, or other local agency only for the costs of restoring and repairing the
 archaeological resources that are the subject of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   (SB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.6.

Expenditures to carry out the purposes of this chapter shall be made only pursuant to legislative appropriation for these purposes or by contract with other state agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1136.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.7.

Upon a conviction pursuant to Section 5097.5, the following items are subject to forfeiture in accordance with the following conditions:

(a) The archaeological resource that was the subject of the violation, and that is in the possession of the person, shall be subject to forfeiture.

(b) (1) A vehicle that was used in connection with the violation may be subject to forfeiture, if the vehicle to be forfeited was not merely a means of transportation to the site but was either of the following:

(A) The vehicle was specifically modified or designed to assist in the commission of
 the crime.

(B) The vehicle was used as part of a pattern or scheme to commit the offense.

(2) A vehicle that is subject to forfeiture shall be released to the legal owner or his or her agent pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21100.4 of the Vehicle Code. A legal owner or his or her agent that obtains a release of the vehicle shall not release the vehicle to the person convicted of a violation of Section 5097.7.

(3) If there is a community property interest in the vehicle subject to forfeiture, the court shall consider whether there is another vehicle available to the party with that interest before ordering forfeiture of the vehicle.

(c) Equipment used in the violation may be subject to
 forfeiture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.   (SB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.75. Native American Historical, Cultural, and Sacred Sites [5097.9. - 5097.991.]

5097.9.

No public agency, and no private party using or occupying public property, or operating on public property, under a public license, permit, grant, lease, or contract made on or after July 1, 1977, shall in any manner whatsoever interfere with the free expression or exercise of Native American religion as provided in the United States Constitution and the California Constitution; nor shall any such agency or party cause severe or irreparable damage to any Native American sanctified cemetery, place of worship, religious or ceremonial site, or sacred shrine located on public property, except on a clear and convincing showing that the public interest and necessity so require. The provisions of this chapter shall be enforced by the commission, pursuant to Sections 5097.94 and 5097.97.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to limit the requirements of the Environmental Quality Act of 1970, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

The public property of all cities, counties, and city and county located within the limits of the city, county, and city and county, except for all parklands in excess of 100 acres, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this section shall, however, nullify protections for Indian cemeteries under other statutes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.91.

There is in state government a Native American Heritage Commission, consisting of nine members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. For purposes of this chapter, “commission” means the Native American Heritage Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 863, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.92.

At least five of the nine members shall be elders, traditional people, or spiritual leaders of California Native American tribes, nominated by Native American organizations, tribes, or groups within the state. The executive secretary of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.93.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed their actual and necessary expenses.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.94.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(a) To identify and catalog places of special religious or social significance to Native Americans, and known graves and cemeteries of Native Americans on private lands. The identification and cataloguing of known graves and cemeteries shall be completed on or before January 1, 1984. The commission shall notify landowners on whose property the graves and cemeteries are determined to exist, and shall identify the Native American group most likely descended from those Native Americans who may be interred on the property.

(b) To make recommendations relative to Native American sacred
 places that are located on private lands, are inaccessible to Native Americans, and have cultural significance to Native Americans for acquisition by the state or other public agencies for the purpose of facilitating or assuring access to those sacred places by Native Americans.

(c) To make recommendations to the Legislature relative to procedures that will voluntarily encourage private property owners to preserve and protect sacred places in a natural state and to allow appropriate access to Native American religionists for ceremonial or spiritual activities.

(d) To appoint necessary clerical staff.

(e) To accept grants or donations, real or in kind, to carry out the purposes of this chapter and the California Native
 American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act of 2001 (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8010) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code).

(f) To make recommendations to the Director of Parks and Recreation and the California Arts Council relative to the California State Indian Museum and other Indian matters touched upon by department programs.

(g) To bring an action to prevent severe and irreparable damage to, or assure appropriate access for Native Americans to, a Native American sanctified cemetery, place of worship, religious or ceremonial site, or sacred shrine located on public property, pursuant to Section 5097.97. If the court finds that severe and irreparable damage will occur or that appropriate access will be denied, and appropriate mitigation
 measures are not available, it shall issue an injunction, unless it finds, on clear and convincing evidence, that the public interest and necessity require otherwise. The Attorney General shall represent the commission and the state in litigation concerning affairs of the commission, unless the Attorney General has determined to represent the agency against whom the commission’s action is directed, in which case the commission shall be authorized to employ other counsel. In an action to enforce this subdivision the commission shall introduce evidence showing that a cemetery, place, site, or shrine has been historically regarded as a sacred or sanctified place by Native American people and represents a place of unique historical and cultural significance to an Indian tribe or community.

(h) To request and use the advice and service of all federal,
 state, local, and regional agencies, including for purposes of carrying out the California Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act of 2001 (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8010) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code).

(i) To assist Native Americans in obtaining appropriate access to sacred places that are located on public lands for ceremonial or spiritual activities.

(j) To assist state agencies in any negotiations with agencies of the federal government for the protection of Native American sacred places that are located on federal lands.

(k) (1) To mediate, upon application of either of the parties, disputes arising between landowners and known descendants relating
 to the treatment and disposition of Native American human burials, skeletal remains, and items associated with Native American burials.

(2) The agreements shall provide protection to Native American human burials and skeletal remains from vandalism and inadvertent destruction and provide for sensitive treatment and disposition of Native American burials, skeletal remains, and associated grave goods consistent with the planned use of, or the approved project on, the land.

(l) To assist interested landowners in developing agreements with appropriate Native American groups for treating or disposing, with appropriate dignity, of the human remains and any items associated with Native American burials.

(m) To
 provide each California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073, on or before July 1, 2016, with a list of all public agencies that may be a lead agency pursuant to Division
 13 (commencing with Section 21000) within the geographic area with which the tribe is traditionally and culturally affiliated, the contact information of those public agencies, and information on how the tribe may request the public agency to notify the tribe of projects within the jurisdiction of those public agencies for the purposes of requesting consultation pursuant to Section 21080.3.1.

(n) (1) To assume the powers and duties of the former Repatriation Oversight Commission and meet, when necessary and at least quarterly, to perform all of the following duties:

(A) Order the repatriation of human remains and cultural items in accordance with the act.

(B) Establish mediation procedures
 and, upon the application of the parties involved, mediate disputes among tribes and museums and agencies relating to the disposition of human remains and cultural items. The commission shall have the power of subpoena for purposes of discovery and may impose civil penalties against any agency or museum that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with the act. Members of the commission and commission staff shall receive training in mediation for purposes of this subparagraph. The commission may delegate its responsibility to mediate disputes to a certified mediator or commission staff.

(C) Establish and maintain an internet website for communication among tribes and museums and agencies.

(D) Upon the request of tribes or museums and agencies, analyze and make
 decisions regarding providing financial assistance to aid in specific repatriation activities.

(E) Make recommendations to the Legislature to assist tribes in obtaining the dedication of appropriate state lands for the purposes of reinterment of human remains and cultural items.

(F) (i) Prepare and submit to the Legislature an annual report detailing commission activities, disbursement of funds, and dispute resolutions relating to the repatriation activities under the act.

(ii) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subparagraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(G) Refer any known
 noncompliance with the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.) to the United States Attorney General and the Secretary of the Interior.

(H) Impose administrative civil penalties pursuant to Section 8029 of the Health and Safety Code against an agency or museum that is determined by the commission to have violated the act.

(I) Establish those rules and regulations the commission determines to be necessary for the administration of the act.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Act” means the California Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation
 Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8010) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code).

(B) “Tribe” means a “California Indian tribe” as that term is used in the act.

(o) (1) To establish and assess a fee on a person or public or private entity that is reasonably related to the cost of conducting a search of catalogs, described in subdivision (a), inventories, described in Section 5097.96, or lists, described in Section 21073, for that person or entity, which funds shall be available to the commission upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(2) The Legislature finds that, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution,
 the fees established pursuant to paragraph (1) are not taxes. To the extent that these fees are appropriated through the Budget Act for the purposes for which they are collected to provide services to the people of the State of California, the Legislature finds that these fees are not subject to Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(p) Review and provide comment and guidance on all policies and procedures proposed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 8025) and Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 8028.7) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 112.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.95.
